Arkansas, session 2025, SB73.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Access to Credit for
Our Rural Economy (ACRE) Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-462. Deduction — Qualified agricultural loans — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Eligible lending institution” means a:
(A) National banking association;
(B) State bank and a registered out-of-state bank, as
those terms are defined in § 23-45-102;
*JLL105*
01/16/2025 7:15:35 AM JLL105

SB73
(C) State trust company, as defined in § 23-51-102; or
(D) Federal savings bank;
(2) “Interest” means interest on indebtedness attributed to the
state and incurred in the ordinary course of the active conduct of any
business;
(3) “Net interest income received from qualified agricultural
loans” means the product of the ratio of the interest income earned on
qualified agricultural loans over total interest income earned, in relation
to the adjusted gross income of the eligible lending institution without
regard to the deduction allowed under this section; and
(4) “Qualified agricultural loan” means a loan that:
(A) Is made on personal property used for an agricultural
purpose, including without limitation equipment and machinery, livestock, and
crops; or
(B) Has the following characteristics:
(i) Is made on real property that is substantially
used for the production of one (1) or more agricultural products;
(ii) Is secured by a:
(a) First lien interest in real property; or
(b) Second lien interest in the real property;
and
(iii) Has an outstanding loan balance that is:
(a) Less than eighty-five percent (85%) of the
appraised value of the real estate; or
(b) More than eighty-five percent (85%) of the
appraised value of the real estate if the loan balance in excess of eighty-
five percent (85%) of the appraised value is insured by private mortgage
insurance.
(b) In computing net income for the purposes of this chapter, there is
allowed as a deduction in addition to all other deductions allowed by law for
the net interest income received from qualified agricultural loans that is
received by an eligible lending institution.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 2 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

01/16/2025 7:15:35 AM JLL105